Washington statutes.
RCW 31.04.237

Use of nationwide mortgage licensing system and registry.

In order to fulfill the purposes of chapter 120, Laws of 2009, the director is authorized to establish relationships or contracts with the nationwide mortgage licensing system *and registry or other entities designated by the nationwide mortgage licensing system *and registry to collect and maintain records and process transaction fees or other fees related to licensees or other persons subject to this chapter.

[ 2009 c 120 s 15.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The term "and registry" was removed by 2013 c 29 s 1.

Findings—Declaration—2009 c 120: See note following RCW 31.04.015.